Illinois, session 104th, HB2645.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $25,000 or so much of that sum as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 7to the Barrington Area Council of Governments to facilitate 8implementation of its Water Resources Initiative that will 9monitor water quality and quantity in the shallow aquifer 10supporting the water needs of the Villages of Barrington, 11Barrington Hills, Deer Park, Lake Barrington, South 12Barrington, and Tower Lakes and the Township of Barrington, as 13well as surrounding areas. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.